District of Columbia statutes.
16-2345

New birth record upon marriage or determination of parents.

(a)

When a certified copy of a marriage certificate is submitted to the Registrar, establishing that the previously unwed parents of a child born out of wedlock have intermarried subsequent to the birth of the child, and the parentage of the child has been judicially determined or acknowledged by each of the parents, or when the parenthood of a child born out of wedlock has been established by judicial process or by acknowledgement by the person whose parenthood is thus determined, or when an agreement and affidavit that meet the requirements of section 16-909.01(a)(2) are submitted to the Registrar, or when a consent to parent a child born by artificial insemination pursuant to § 16-909(e)(1)(A) and § 7-205(e)(3A), is submitted to the Registrar, a new certificate of birth bearing the original date of birth and the names of both parents shall be issued and substituted for the certificate of birth then on file. The new birth certificate shall nowhere on its face show that the parentage has been established by judicial process or by acknowledgement. The original certificate of birth and all papers pertaining to the issuance of the new certificate shall be placed under seal and opened for inspection only upon order of the Family Division.

(b)

Voluntary acknowledgments and adjudications of paternity by administrative processes that meet federal requirements and are obtained in accordance with sections 16-909.03 through 16-909.05 and 16-2342.01(c), shall be filed with the Registrar of Vital Records.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 592, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 544, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 121(a)
Oct. 1, 1976, D.C. Law 1-87, § 20(d), 23 DCR 2544
Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-107, title I, § 112, 23 DCR 8737
Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-34, § 29(g), 28 DCR 3271
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-39, § 2(e), 38 DCR 4970
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 18(i), 44 DCR 1271
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 10(gg), 45 DCR 745
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 57(b)(1), 46 DCR 2118
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-269, § 106(q), 48 DCR 1270
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 18-33, § 3(n), 56 DCR 4269
New birth certificates, written acknowledgment of parentage, see § 7-210.
This section is referenced in § 7-210.
1981 Ed., § 16-2345.
1973 Ed., § 16-2345.
D.C. Law 13-269 designated existing text as subsec. (a) and added subsec. (b).
D.C. Law 18-33, in the section heading, deleted “natural” preceding “parents”; and, in subsec. (a), substituted “the requirements of section 16-909.01(a)(2) are submitted to the Registrar, or when a consent to parent a child born by artificial insemination pursuant to § 16-909(e)(1)(A) and § 7-205(e)(3A), is submitted to the Registrar,” for “the requirements of section 16-909.01(a)(2) are submitted to the Registrar,”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 5(s) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-210, April 13, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 3832).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 105(s) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-57, March 7, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 1979).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 105(s) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-207, March 31, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3238).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 5(v) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-439, August 12, 1998, 45 DCR 6110), § 5(v) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-503, October 27, 1998, 45 DCR 8495), and § 5(v) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. 12-600, January 20, 1999, 46 DCR 1239).
For temporary repeal of D.C. Law 12-210, see § 113 of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-126, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6606).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 105(s) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-126, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6606).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 105(s) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-177, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9678).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 105(s) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-241, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 581).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 105(s) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-446, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9213).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 106(q) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-5, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2440).